Washington statutes.
RCW 15.49.031

Labels—Required information.

In addition to the requirements contained in RCW 15.49.021, each seed label shall contain the following:

(1) The name and address of the person who labeled the seed and who sells, offers, or exposes the seed for sale within the state;

(2) Lot number identification;

(3) Seed origin;

(4) Germination rate and date of germination test or the year for which the seed was packaged for sale.

[ 1989 c 354 s 72.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 354 ss 70-81 and 84-86: See note following RCW 15.49.005.

Severability—1989 c 354: See note following RCW 15.36.012.